dev/apertium-en-de/apertium-en-de.de.dix
    <pardef n="/tun__vbdo">
      <e>       <p>   <l>tun</l>     <r>tun<s n="vbdo"/><s n="inf"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>getan</l>   <r>tun<s n="vbdo"/><s n="pp"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>tuend</l>   <r>tun<s n="vbdo"/><s n="pprs"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>tu</l>      <r>tun<s n="vbdo"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p>   <l>tut</l>     <r>tun<s n="vbdo"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>tue</l>     <r>tun<s n="vbdo"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>tust</l>    <r>tun<s n="vbdo"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>tut</l>     <r>tun<s n="vbdo"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>tun</l>     <r>tun<s n="vbdo"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>tut</l>     <r>tun<s n="vbdo"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>tun</l>     <r>tun<s n="vbdo"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>tat</l>     <r>tun<s n="vbdo"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>tatest</l>  <r>tun<s n="vbdo"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>tatst</l>   <r>tun<s n="vbdo"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>tat</l>     <r>tun<s n="vbdo"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>taten</l>   <r>tun<s n="vbdo"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>tatet</l>   <r>tun<s n="vbdo"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>taten</l>   <r>tun<s n="vbdo"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/dürfen__vbmod">
      <e>       <p>   <l>dürfen</l>  <r>dürfen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>gedurft</l> <r>dürfen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>dürfend</l> <r>dürfen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>darf</l>    <r>dürfen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>darfst</l>  <r>dürfen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>darf</l>    <r>dürfen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>dürfen</l>  <r>dürfen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>dürft</l>   <r>dürfen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>dürfen</l>  <r>dürfen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>durfte</l>  <r>dürfen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>durftest</l><r>dürfen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>durfte</l>  <r>dürfen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>durften</l> <r>dürfen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>durftet</l> <r>dürfen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>durften</l> <r>dürfen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/können__vbmod">
      <e>       <p>   <l>können</l>  <r>können<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>gekonnt</l> <r>können<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>könnend</l> <r>können<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>kann</l>    <r>können<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>kannst</l>  <r>können<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>kann</l>    <r>können<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>können</l>  <r>können<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>könnt</l>   <r>können<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>können</l>  <r>können<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>konnte</l>  <r>können<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>konntest</l><r>können<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>konnte</l>  <r>können<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>konnten</l> <r>können<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>konntet</l> <r>können<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>konnten</l> <r>können<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>könne</l>   <r>können<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>könnest</l> <r>können<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>könne</l>   <r>können<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>können</l>  <r>können<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>könnet</l>  <r>können<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>können</l>  <r>können<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>könnte</l>  <r>können<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>könntest</l><r>können<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>könnte</l>  <r>können<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>könnten</l> <r>können<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>könntet</l> <r>können<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>könnten</l> <r>können<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="tun"><i></i><par n="/tun__vbdo"/></e>
    <e lm="dürfen"><i></i><par n="/dürfen__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="können"><i></i><par n="/können__vbmod"/></e>
